District of Columbia statutes.
2-1204.12

Rulemaking.

The Mayor may promulgate rules necessary to implement this chapter.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-290, § 3, 54 DCR 984
2001 Ed., § 39-502.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3 of Film DC Economic Incentive Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-570, December 19, 2006, 54 DCR 8).
Delegation of Authority under the Financial Incentives for Motion Picture and Television Productions Emergency Amendment Act of 2009, effective October 15, 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207; 56 DCR 8277), see Mayor’s Order 2009-213, December 8, 2009 ( 56 DCR 9350).